California statutes. Education Code
(b) Cooperate with the county office and other districts in the geographic areas in planning its option under Section 56195.1 and each fiscal year, notify the department, impacted special education local plan areas, and participating county offices of its intent to elect an alternative option from those specified in Section 56195.1, at least one year before the proposed effective date of the implementation of the alternative plan.

(c) Cooperate with the county office to assure that the local plan is compatible with other local plans in the county, including the local control and accountability plans adopted for the district and the county board of education, and any county plan of a contiguous county.

(d) Submit to the county office for
 review any local plan developed under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 56195.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 91.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56195.5.

(a) Each county office and district governing board shall have authority over the programs it directly maintains, consistent with the local plan submitted pursuant to Section 56195.1. In counties with more than one special education local plan area for which the county office provides services, relevant provisions of contracts between the county office and its employees governing wages, hours, and working conditions shall supersede like provisions contained in a plan submitted under Section 56195.1.

(b) Any county office or district governing board may provide for the education of individual pupils in special education programs maintained by other districts or counties, and may include within the special education programs pupils who reside in other districts or counties. Section 46600 shall apply to interdistrict attendance agreements for programs conducted pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Local Requirements [56195.7. - 56195.10.]

56195.7.

In addition to the provisions required to be included in the local plan pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56205), each special education local plan area that submits a local plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56195.1 and each county office that submits a local plan pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56195.1 shall develop written agreements to be entered into by entities participating in the plan. The agreements need not be submitted to the superintendent. These agreements shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A coordinated identification, referral, and placement system pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56300).

(b) Procedural safeguards pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500).

(c) Regionalized services to local programs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Program specialist service pursuant to Section 56368.

(2) Personnel development, including training for staff, parents, and members of the community advisory committee pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56240).

(3) Evaluation pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 56600).

(4) Data collection and development of management information systems.

(5) Curriculum development.

(6) Provision for ongoing review of programs conducted, and procedures utilized, under the local plan, and a mechanism for correcting any identified problem.

(d) A description of the process for coordinating services with other local public agencies that are funded to serve individuals with exceptional needs.

(e) A description of the process for coordinating and providing services to individuals with exceptional needs placed in public hospitals, proprietary hospitals, and other residential medical facilities pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 56167) of Chapter 2.

(f) A description of the process for coordinating and providing services to individuals with exceptional needs placed in licensed children’s institutions and foster family homes pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 56155) of Chapter 2.

(g) A description of the process for coordinating and providing services to individuals with exceptional needs placed in juvenile court schools or county community schools pursuant to Section 56150.

(h) A budget for special education and related services that shall be maintained by the special education local plan area and be open to the public covering the entities providing programs or services within the special education local plan area. The budget language shall be presented in a form that is understandable by the general public. For each local educational agency or other entity providing a program or service, the budget, at minimum, shall display the following:

(1) Expenditures by object code and classification for the previous fiscal year and the budget by the same object code classification for the current fiscal year.

(2) The number and type of certificated instructional and support personnel, including the type of class setting to which they are assigned, if appropriate.

(3) The number of instructional aides and other qualified classified personnel.

(4) The number of enrolled individuals with exceptional needs receiving each type of service provided.

(i) For multidistrict special education local plan areas, a description of the policymaking process that shall include a description of the local method used to distribute state and federal funds among the local educational agencies in the special education local plan area. The local method to distribute funds shall be approved according to the policymaking process established consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 56001 and pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 56205.

(j) (1) In accordance with Section 1413 of Title 20 of the United States Code, each single-district special education local plan area established pursuant to Section 56195.1 shall have a written procedure for the ongoing review of programs conducted, and procedures utilized pursuant to Section 56205, under the local plan as defined pursuant to Section 56027 and administered pursuant to Section 56195, and a mechanism for correcting any identified problem pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(2) Multidistrict special education local plan areas established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56195.1 and a district or districts joined with the county office in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 56195.1 shall have a written agreement entered into by entities participating in the local plan that includes a provision for ongoing review of programs conducted, and procedures utilized, under the local plan, and a mechanism for correcting any identified problem pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(3) The written procedure referenced in paragraph (1) and the written agreement referenced in paragraph (2) need not be submitted to the superintendent but shall be available upon request by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 45.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56195.8.

(a) Each entity providing special education under this part shall adopt policies for the programs and services it operates, consistent with agreements adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 56195.1 or Section 56195.7. The policies need not be submitted to the superintendent.

(b) The policies shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Nonpublic, nonsectarian services, including those provided pursuant to Sections 56365 and 56366.

(2) Review, at a general education or special education teacher’s request, of the assignment of an individual with exceptional needs to his or her class and a mandatory meeting of the individualized education program team if the review indicates a change in the pupil’s placement, instruction, related services, or any combination thereof. The procedures shall indicate which personnel are responsible for the reviews and a timetable for completion of the review.

(3) Procedural safeguards pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56500).

(4) Resource specialists pursuant to Section 56362.

(5) Transportation, where appropriate, which describes how special education transportation is coordinated with regular home-to-school transportation. The policy shall set forth criteria for meeting the transportation needs of special education pupils. The policy shall include procedures to ensure compatibility between mobile seating devices, when used, and the securement systems required by Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 222 (49 C.F.R. 571.222) and to ensure that schoolbus drivers are trained in the proper installation of mobile seating devices in the securement systems.

(6) Information on the number of individuals with exceptional needs who are being provided special education and related services.

(7) Caseloads pursuant to Chapter 4.45 (commencing with Section 56440) of Part 30. The policies, with respect to caseloads, shall not be developed until guidelines or proposed regulations are issued pursuant to Section 56441.7. The guidelines or proposed regulations shall be considered when developing the caseload policy. A statement of justification shall be attached if the local caseload policy exceeds state guidelines or proposed regulations.

(c) The policies may include, but are not limited to, provisions for involvement of district and county governing board members in any due process hearing procedure activities conducted pursuant to, and consistent with, state and federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56195.9.

(a) The plan for special education shall be developed and updated cooperatively by a committee of representatives of special and regular teachers and administrators selected by the groups they represent and with participation by parent members of the community advisory committee, or parents selected by the community advisory committee, to ensure adequate and effective participation and communication.

(b) Commencing July 1,
 2020, a special education local plan area shall review its local plan at least once every three years and update as needed to ensure information contained within the plan remains relevant and accurate. This requirement shall not be construed to change the annual budget plan, annual service plan, and annual assurances support plan requirements that are contained in Section 56205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 92.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56195.10.

Unless the process described in subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 specifies an alternative method of distribution of state and local funds among the participating local educational agencies, the funds shall be distributed by the special education local plan area as allocated instructional personnel service units and operated as computed in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56700) as that chapter existed on December 31, 1998, or Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 56835).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 29.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Elements of the Local Plan [56205. - 56245.]



  ARTICLE 1.1. State Requirements [56205. - 56208.]

56205.

(a) Each special education local plan area submitting a local plan to the Superintendent under this part shall ensure, in conformity with Sections 1412(a) and 1413(a)(1) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and in accordance with Section 300.201 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that it has in effect policies, procedures, and programs that are consistent with state laws, regulations, and policies governing the following:

(1) Free appropriate public education.

(2) Full educational opportunity.

(3) Child find and referral.

(4) Individualized education programs, including development, implementation, review, and revision.

(5) Least restrictive environment.

(6) Procedural safeguards.

(7) Annual and triennial assessments.

(8) Confidentiality.

(9) Transition from Subchapter III (commencing with Section 1431) of Title 20 of the United States Code to the preschool program.

(10) Children in private schools.

(11) Compliance assurances, including general compliance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the
 federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), federal regulations relating thereto, and this part.

(12) (A) A description of the governance and administration of the local plan, including identification of the governing body of a multidistrict local plan or the individual responsible for administration in a single district local plan, and of the elected officials to whom the governing body or individual is responsible.

(B) A description of the
 regionalized operations and services listed in Section 56836.23 and the direct instructional support provided by program specialists in accordance with Section 56368 to be provided through the local plan.

(C) Verification that a community advisory committee has been established pursuant to Section 56190.

(D) Multidistrict
 local plans, submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 56195.1, shall do the following:

(i) Specify the responsibilities of each participating county office and district governing board in the policymaking process, the responsibilities of the superintendents of each participating district and county in the implementation of the
 local plan, and the responsibilities of district and county administrators of special education in coordinating the administration of the local plan.

(ii) Identify the respective roles of the administrative unit and the administrator of the special education local plan area and the individual local educational agencies within the special education local plan area in relation to the following:

(I) The hiring, supervision, evaluation, and discipline of the administrator of the special education local plan area and staff employed by the administrative unit in support of the local plan.

(II) The allocation from the state of federal and state funds to the special education local plan area administrative unit or to local educational agencies within the special education local plan
 area.

(III) The operation of special education programs.

(IV) Monitoring the appropriate use of federal, state, and local funds allocated for special education programs.

(V) The preparation of program and fiscal reports required of the special education local plan area by the state.

(iii) Include copies of joint powers agreements or contractual agreements, as appropriate, for districts and counties that elect to enter into those agreements pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 56195.1.

(E) The description of the governance and administration of the local plan, and the
 policymaking process, shall be consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 56001, subdivision (a) of Section 56195.3, and Section 56195.9, and shall reflect a schedule of regular consultations regarding policy and budget development with representatives of special education and regular education teachers and administrators selected by the groups they represent and parent members of the community advisory committee established pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 56190) of Chapter 2.

(13) Personnel qualifications to ensure that personnel, including special education teachers and personnel and paraprofessionals providing related services, necessary to implement this part are appropriately and adequately prepared and trained in accordance with Sections 56058 and 56070 and Sections 1412(a)(14) and 1413(a)(3) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(14) Performance goals and
 indicators.

(15) Participation in state and districtwide assessments, including assessments described under Section 1111 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) and alternate assessments in accordance with Section 1412(a)(16) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and reports relating to assessments.

(16) Supplementation of state, local, and other federal funds, including nonsupplantation of funds.

(17) Maintenance of financial effort.

(18) Opportunities for public participation before adoption of
 policies and procedures.

(19) Suspension and expulsion rates.

(20) Access to instructional materials by blind individuals with exceptional needs and others with print disabilities in accordance with Section 1412(a)(23) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(21) Overidentification and disproportionate representation by race and ethnicity of children as individuals with exceptional needs, including children with disabilities with a particular impairment described in Section 1401 of Title 20 of the United States Code and in accordance with Section 1412(a)(24) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(22) Prohibition of mandatory medication use pursuant to Section 56040.5 and in accordance with Section 1412(a)(25) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) Each local plan submitted to the Superintendent under this part shall also contain all the following:

(1) An annual budget plan that shall be adopted at a public hearing held by the special education local plan area. Notice of this hearing shall be posted in each school in the local plan area at least 15 days before the hearing. The annual budget plan may be revised during any fiscal year according to the policymaking process established pursuant to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) and consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 56001 and Section 56195.9. The annual budget plan shall identify expected expenditures for all items required by this part
 which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) A description of the special education local plan area’s allocation plan in accordance with Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836), including funds apportioned to the administrative unit of the special education local plan area.

(B) All revenues by revenue source received by the special education local plan area specifically for the purpose of special education, including any property taxes allocated to the special education local plan area as designated in Section 2572.

(C) A breakdown of the distribution of funds to each local educational agency within the special education local plan area.

(D) A description of projected total special education expenditures by local educational agency, including supplemental aids and services to meet the individual needs of pupils placed in regular education classrooms and
environments and special education services to pupils with low incidence disabilities.

(E) A description of projected total expenditures by the special education local plan area and the local educational agencies within the special education local plan area by standardized account code structure object code.

(F) A description of projected funding to be received specifically for regionalized operations and a breakdown of projected special education local plan area operating expenditures by
 standardized account code structure object code.

(2) An annual service plan that shall be adopted at a public hearing held by the special education local plan area. Notice of this hearing shall be posted in each school in the special education local plan area at least 15 days
 before the hearing. The annual service plan may be revised during any fiscal year according to the policymaking process established pursuant to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) and consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 56001 and with Section 56195.9. The annual service plan shall include a description of services to be provided by each local educational agency, including the nature of the services and the physical location at which the services will be provided, including alternative schools, opportunity schools and classes, community day schools operated by districts, community schools operated by county offices,
 and juvenile court schools, regardless of whether the
 local educational agency is participating in the local plan. This description shall demonstrate that all individuals with exceptional needs shall have access to services and instruction appropriate to meet their needs as specified in their individualized education programs.

(3) An annual assurances support plan that shall be adopted at a public hearing held by the special education local plan area. Notice of this hearing shall be posted in each school in the special education local plan area at least 15 days before the hearing. The annual assurances support plan may be revised during any fiscal year according to the policymaking process established pursuant to subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) and consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 56001 and with Section 56195.9. The annual assurances
 support plan shall meet the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 56122.

(4) A description of programs for early childhood special education from birth through five years of age.

(5) A description of the method by which members of the public, including parents or guardians of individuals with exceptional
 needs who are receiving services under the
 local
 plan, may address questions or concerns to the governing body or individual identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (12) of subdivision (a).

(6) A description of a dispute resolution process, including mediation and final and binding arbitration to resolve disputes over the distribution of funding, the responsibility for service provision, and the other governance activities specified within the local plan.

(7) Verification that the
 local plan has been reviewed by the community advisory committee and that the committee had at least 30 days to conduct this review before submission of the local plan to the Superintendent.

(8) A description of the process being utilized to meet the requirements of Section 56303.

(c) A description of the process being utilized to oversee and evaluate placements in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and the method of ensuring that all requirements of each pupil’s individualized education program are being met. The description shall include a method for evaluating whether the pupil is making appropriate educational progress.

(d) The local plan, budget plan, annual service plan, and annual assurances support plan shall adhere to the guidelines established pursuant to Section 56122, and shall
 be written in language that is understandable to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 93.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56205.5.

(a) The superintendent or other chief administrator of a local educational agency shall post on the Internet Web site of the local educational agency any local plan, annual budget plan, annual service plan, and annual assurances support plan upon approval of the special education local plan area, and any updates or revisions to the plans upon approval of the special education local plan area.

(b) A county superintendent of schools shall do both of the following:

(1) Post on the Internet Web site of the county office any local plan, annual budget plan, annual service plan, and annual assurances support plan upon approval of the county office, and any updates or revisions to the
 plans upon approval of the county office.

(2) Post on the Internet Web site of the county office all local plans submitted by special education local plan areas in the county, or links to those plans.

(c) A complete copy of the local plan, annual budget plan, annual service plan, annual assurances support plan, and policies and procedures shall be held on file in the special education local plan area office and at each participating local educational agency, and shall be accessible to any interested party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 94.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

56206.

As a part of the local plan submitted pursuant to Section 56205, each special education local plan area shall describe how specialized equipment and services will be distributed within the local plan area in a manner that minimizes the necessity to serve pupils in isolated sites and maximizes the opportunities to serve pupils in the least restrictive environments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56207.

(a) No educational programs and services already in operation in school districts or a county office of education pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) shall be transferred to another school district or a county office of education or from a county office of education to a school district unless the special education local plan area has developed a plan for the transfer which addresses, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Pupil needs.

(2) The availability of the full continuum of services to affected pupils.

(3) The functional continuation of the current individualized education programs of all affected pupils.

(4) The provision of services in the least restrictive environment from which affected pupils can benefit.

(5) The maintenance of all appropriate support services.

(6) The assurance that there will be compliance with all federal and state laws and regulations and special education local plan area policies.

(7) The means through which parents and staff were represented in the planning process.

(b) The date on which the transfer will take effect may be no earlier than the first day of the second fiscal year beginning after the date on which the sending or receiving agency has informed the other agency and the governing body or individual identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 56205, unless the governing body or individual identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 56205 unanimously approves the transfer taking effect on the first day of the first fiscal year following that date.

(c) If either the sending or receiving agency disagree with the proposed transfer, the matter shall be resolved by the alternative resolution process established pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 56205.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 56208, this section shall apply to all special education local plan areas commencing on July 1, 1998, whether or not a special education local plan area has submitted a revised local plan for approval or has an approved revised local plan pursuant to Section 56836.03.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 55.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

56207.5.

A request by a charter school to participate as a local educational agency in a special education local plan area may not be treated differently from a similar request made by a school district. In reviewing and approving a request by a charter school to participate as a local educational agency in a special education local plan area, the following requirements shall apply:

(a) The special education local plan area shall comply with Section 56140.

(b) The charter school shall participate in state and federal funding for special education and the allocation plan developed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 56195.7 or Section 56836.05 in the same manner as other local educational agencies of the special education local plan area.

(c) The charter school shall participate in governance of the special education local plan area in the same manner as other local educational agencies of the special education local plan area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 44.6.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56208.

This article shall apply to special education local plan areas that are submitting a revised local plan for approval pursuant to Section 56836.03 or that have an approved revised local plan pursuant to Section 56836.03.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Special Education Local Plan Areas with Small or Sparse Populations [56211. - 56214.]

56211.

A special education local plan area submitting a local plan, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56195.1, which includes all of the school districts located in the county or counties submitting the plan, except those participating in a countywide special education local plan area located in an adjacent county, and which meets the criteria for special education local plan areas with small populations set forth in Section 56212, is eligible to request that designation in its local plan application.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 18) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 33.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56212.

An eligible special education local plan area, which submits a local plan under the provisions of Section 56211, may request designation as a necessary small special education local plan area if its total reported units of average daily attendance in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, is less than 15,000, and if it includes all of the school districts located in the county or counties participating in the local plan, except those districts participating in a countywide special education local plan area located in an adjacent county that also meets the criteria of this section.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854, Sec. 20) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 34.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56214.

For the 2020–21 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, a necessary small special education local plan area, as described in Section 56212, shall receive, in addition to the funding it received in the 2019–20 fiscal year, an additional funding amount equal to the sum of both of the following:

(a) The amount it received in the 2019–20 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56213, as that section read on January 1, 2020.

(b) A proportional share of any additional funding provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 65.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Staff Development [56240. - 56245.]

56240.

Staff development programs shall be provided for regular and special education teachers, administrators, certificated and classified employees, volunteers, community advisory committee members and, as appropriate, members of the district and county governing boards. The programs shall be coordinated with other staff development programs in the special education local plan area, including school level staff development programs authorized by state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56241.

Staff development programs shall include, but not be limited to, all the following:

(a) Provision of opportunities for all school personnel, paraprofessionals, and volunteers to participate in ongoing development activities pursuant to a systematic identification of pupil and personnel needs.

(b) Be designed and implemented by classroom teachers and other participating school personnel, including the school principal. Teachers shall comprise the majority of any group designated to design local staff development programs for instructional personnel to be established pursuant to this part. Positive efforts shall be made to ensure the individuals with exceptional needs and parents of such individuals are involved in the design and implementation of staff development programs.

(c) Allowance for diversity in development activities, including, but not limited to, small groups, self-directed learning, and systematic observation during visits to other classrooms or schools.

(d) Scheduling of time which is set aside for such purpose throughout the school year, including, but not limited to, time when participating school personnel are released from their regular duties.

(e) Evaluation and modification on a continuing basis by participating school personnel with the aid of outside personnel, as necessary.

(f) Inclusion of the school principal and other administrative personnel as active participants in one or more staff development activities implemented pursuant to this chapter.

(g) Provision of a budget for reasonable and necessary expenses, relating to staff development programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 797, Sec. 9.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56243.

It is the intent of the Legislature, pursuant to this article, that a local educational agency provide regular classroom teachers serving individuals with exceptional needs appropriate training each year relating to the needs of those individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56244.

The superintendent shall, to the extent possible using federal and state funds appropriated for this purpose, provide staff development to child care center staff and family day care providers to improve child care services to individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1596, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

56245.

The Legislature encourages the inclusion, in local in-service training programs for regular education teachers and special education teachers in local educational agencies, of a component on the recognition of, and teaching strategies for, specific learning disabilities, including dyslexia and related disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Identification and Referral, Assessment, Instructional Planning, Implementation,and Review [56300. - 56385.]



  ARTICLE 1. Identification and Referral [56300. - 56305.]

56300.

A local educational agency shall actively and systematically seek out all individuals with exceptional needs, from birth to 21 years of age, inclusive, including children not enrolled in public school programs, who reside in a school district or are under the jurisdiction of a special education local plan area or a county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56301.

(a) All children with disabilities residing in the state, including children with disabilities who are homeless children or are wards of the state and children with disabilities attending private, including religious, elementary and secondary schools, regardless of the severity of their disabilities, and who are in need of special education and related services, shall be identified, located, and assessed and a practical method is developed and implemented to determine which children with disabilities are currently receiving needed special education and related services as required by Sections 1412(a)(3) and 1412(a)(10)(A)(ii) of Title 20 of the United States Code. A child is not required to be classified by their disability so long as each child
 who has a disability listed in Section 1401(3) of Title 20 of the United States Code and who, by reason of that disability, needs special education and related services as an individual with exceptional needs defined in Section 56026.

(b) (1) In accordance with Section 300.111(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the requirements of this section also apply to highly mobile individuals with exceptional needs, including migrant children, and children who are suspected of being an individual with exceptional needs pursuant to Section 56026 and in need of special education, even though they are advancing from grade to grade.

(2) In accordance with Section 300.213 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the local educational agency shall
 cooperate in the efforts of the federal Secretary of Education, under Section 6398 of Title 20 of the United States Code, to ensure the linkage of records pertaining to migratory children with disabilities for the purpose of electronically exchanging, among other states, health and educational information regarding those children.

(c) (1) The child find process shall ensure the equitable participation in special education and related services of parentally placed private schoolchildren with disabilities and an accurate count of those children. Child find activities conducted by local educational agencies, or where applicable, the department, shall be similar to those activities undertaken for pupils in public schools.

(2) In accordance with Section
 1412(a)(10)(A)(ii)(IV) of Title 20 of the United States Code, the cost of the child find activities in private, including religious, elementary and secondary schools, may not be considered in determining whether a local educational agency has met its obligations under the proportionate funding provisions for children enrolled in private, including religious, elementary and secondary schools.

(3) The child find process described in paragraph (1) shall be completed in a time period comparable to that for other pupils attending public schools in the local educational agency.

(d) (1) Each special education local plan area shall establish written policies and procedures pursuant to Section 56205 for use by its constituent local agencies for a continuous child find
 system
 that addresses the relationships among identification, screening, referral, assessment, planning, implementation, review, and the triennial assessment. The policies and procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, written notification to all parents of their rights under this chapter, and the procedure for initiating a referral for assessment to identify individuals with exceptional needs.

(2) In accordance with Section 1415(d)(1)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.504(a) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, parents and pupils shall be given a copy of their rights and procedural safeguards once every school year and at all of the following times:

(A) Upon initial referral or parental request for assessment.

(B) Upon receipt of the first state complaint under Section 56500.2 in a school year.

(C) Upon receipt of the first due process hearing request under Section 56502 in a school year.

(D) When a decision is made to make a removal that constitutes a change of placement of an individual with exceptional needs because of a violation of a code of pupil conduct in accordance with Section 300.530(h) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(E) Upon request by a parent or pupil.

(3) A local educational agency may place a current copy of the procedural safeguards notice on its internet website, if the